Hawaii statutes.
[§196-65] Hawaii green infrastructure special fund. (a) There is established the Hawaii green infrastructure special fund
into which shall be deposited:

(1) The
proceeds of bonds net of issuance costs and reserves or overcollateralization
amounts;

(2) Green infrastructure charges received for the use
and services of the loan program, including the repayment of loans made under
the loan program;

(3) All other funds received by the department or the authority and legally available for the purposes of the green
infrastructure special fund;

(4) Interest earnings on all amounts in the green infrastructure
special fund; and

(5) Such other moneys as shall be permitted by an
order of the public utilities commission.

The Hawaii green
infrastructure special fund shall not be subject to section 37-53. Any amounts
received from green infrastructure charges or any other net proceeds earned
from the allocation, use, expenditure, or other disposition of amounts approved
by the public utilities commission and deposited or held in the Hawaii green
infrastructure special fund in excess of amounts necessary for the purposes of
subsection (b) shall be credited to electric utility customers as provided in a
green infrastructure loan program order or orders. Funds that are transferred
back to the electric utility in order to credit electric utility customers
under this subsection shall not be considered revenue of the electric utility
and shall not be subject to state or county taxes.

(b) Moneys in the Hawaii green infrastructure
special fund may be used, subject to the approval of the public utilities
commission, for the purposes of:

(1) Making green infrastructure loans;

(2) Paying administrative costs of the Hawaii
green infrastructure loan program;

(3) Paying any other costs related to the Hawaii
green infrastructure loan program; or

(4) Paying financing costs, as defined in
section 269-161, to the extent permitted by the public utilities commission in
a financing order issued pursuant to section 269-163.

(c) The authority may invest funds held in the Hawaii green
infrastructure special fund in investments as permitted by law, and in accordance with approved investment guidelines established in
one or more orders issued by the public utilities commission pursuant to section
269-171. All amounts in the Hawaii green infrastructure
special fund shall be exempt from all taxes and surcharges imposed by the State or the counties. [L 2013, c 211, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next